Missouri, session 2026, SB1292.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 190.103 and 190.105, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 190.103 and 190.105, to read as follows:
190.103. 1. One physician with expertise in emergency
medical services from each of the EMS regions shall be
elected by that region's EMS medical directors to serve as a
regional EMS medical director. The regional EMS medical
directors shall constitute the state EMS medical director's
advisory committee and shall advise the department and their
region's ambulance services on matters relating to medical
control and medical direction in accordance with sections
190.001 to 190.245 and rules adopted by the department
pursuant to sections 190.001 to 190.245. The regional EMS
medical director shall serve a term of four years. The
southwest, northwest, and Kansas City regional EMS medical
directors shall be elected to an initial two-year term. The
central, east central, and southeast regional EMS medical
directors shall be elected to an initial four-year term.
All subsequent terms following the initial terms shall be
four years. The state EMS medical director shall be the

SB 1292 2
chair of the state EMS medical director's advisory
committee, and shall be elected by the members of the
regional EMS medical director's advisory committee, shall
serve a term of four years, and shall seek to coordinate EMS
services between the EMS regions, promote educational
efforts for agency medical directors, represent Missouri EMS
nationally in the role of the state EMS medical director,
and seek to incorporate the EMS system into the health care
system serving Missouri.
2. A medical director is required for all ambulance
services and emergency medical response agencies that
provide: advanced life support services; basic life support
services utilizing medications or providing assistance with
patients' medications; or basic life support services
performing invasive procedures including invasive airway
procedures. The medical director shall provide medical
direction to these services and agencies in these instances.
3. The medical director, in cooperation with the
ambulance service or emergency medical response agency
administrator, shall have the responsibility and the
authority to ensure that the personnel working under their
supervision are able to provide care meeting established
standards of care with consideration for state and national
standards as well as local area needs and resources. The
medical director, in cooperation with the ambulance service
or emergency medical response agency administrator, shall
establish and develop triage, treatment and transport
protocols, which may include authorization for standing
orders. Emergency medical technicians shall only perform
those medical procedures as directed by treatment protocols
approved by the local medical director or when authorized
through direct communication with online medical control.

SB 1292 3
4. All ambulance services and emergency medical
response agencies that are required to have a medical
director shall establish an agreement between the service or
agency and their medical director. The agreement will
include the roles, responsibilities and authority of the
medical director beyond what is granted in accordance with
sections 190.001 to 190.245 and rules adopted by the
department pursuant to sections 190.001 to 190.245. The
agreement shall also include grievance procedures regarding
the emergency medical response agency or ambulance service,
personnel and the medical director.
5. Regional EMS medical directors and the state EMS
medical director elected as provided under subsection 1 of
this section shall be considered public officials for
purposes of sovereign immunity, official immunity, and the
Missouri public duty doctrine defenses.
6. The state EMS medical director's advisory committee
shall be considered a peer review committee under section
537.035.
7. Regional EMS medical directors may act to provide
online telecommunication medical direction to AEMTs, EMTs,
paramedics, and community paramedics and provide offline
medical direction per standardized treatment, triage, and
transport protocols when EMS personnel, including AEMTs,
EMTs, paramedics, and community paramedics, are providing
care to special needs patients or at the request of a local
EMS agency or medical director.
8. When developing treatment protocols for special
needs patients, regional EMS medical directors may
promulgate such protocols on a regional basis across
multiple political subdivisions' jurisdictional boundaries,
and such protocols may be used by multiple agencies

SB 1292 4
including, but not limited to, ambulance services, emergency
response agencies, and public health departments. Treatment
protocols shall include steps to ensure the receiving
hospital is informed of the pending arrival of the special
needs patient, the condition of the patient, and the
treatment instituted.
9. Multiple EMS agencies including, but not limited
to, ambulance services, emergency response agencies, and
public health departments shall take necessary steps to
follow the regional EMS protocols established as provided
under subsection 8 of this section in cases of mass casualty
or state-declared disaster incidents.
10. When regional EMS medical directors develop and
implement treatment protocols for patients or provide online
medical direction for patients, such activity shall not be
construed as having usurped local medical direction
authority in any manner.
11. The state EMS medical directors advisory committee
100 shall review and make recommendations regarding all proposed
101 community and regional time-critical diagnosis plans.
102 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
103 contrary, when regional EMS medical directors are providing
104 either online telecommunication medical direction to AEMTs,
105 EMTs, paramedics, and community paramedics, or offline
106 medical direction per standardized EMS treatment, triage,
107 and transport protocols for patients, those medical
108 directions or treatment protocols may include the
109 administration of the patient's own prescription medications.
110 13. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
111 contrary, no transportation protocol or physician order
112 shall direct an ambulance service to transport a patient to

SB 1292 5
113 an abortion facility, as such term is defined in section
114 188.015.
190.105. 1. No person, either as owner, agent or
otherwise, shall furnish, operate, conduct, maintain,
advertise, or otherwise be engaged in or profess to be
engaged in the business or service of the transportation of
patients by ambulance in the air, upon the streets, alleys,
or any public way or place of the state of Missouri unless
such person holds a currently valid license from the
department for an ambulance service issued pursuant to the
provisions of sections 190.001 to 190.245.
2. No ground ambulance shall be operated for ambulance
purposes, and no individual shall drive, attend or permit it
to be operated for such purposes in the state of Missouri
unless the ground ambulance is under the immediate
supervision and direction of a person who is holding a
currently valid Missouri license as an emergency medical
technician. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
mean that a duly registered nurse, a duly licensed
physician, or a duly licensed physician assistant be
required to hold an emergency medical technician's license.
When a physician assistant is in attendance with a patient
on an ambulance, the physician assistant shall be exempt
from any mileage limitations in any collaborative practice
arrangement prescribed under law. Each ambulance service is
responsible for assuring that any person driving its
ambulance is competent in emergency vehicle operations and
has a safe driving record. Each ground ambulance shall be
staffed with at least two licensed individuals when
transporting a patient, except as provided in section
190.094. In emergency situations which require additional
medical personnel to assist the patient during

SB 1292 6
transportation, an emergency medical responder, firefighter,
or law enforcement personnel with a valid driver's license
and prior experience with driving emergency vehicles may
drive the ground ambulance provided the ground ambulance
service stipulates to this practice in operational policies.
3. No license shall be required for an ambulance
service, or for the attendant of an ambulance, which:
(1) Is rendering assistance in the case of an
emergency, major catastrophe or any other unforeseen event
or series of events which jeopardizes the ability of the
local ambulance service to promptly respond to emergencies;
or
(2) Is operated from a location or headquarters
outside of Missouri in order to transport patients who are
picked up beyond the limits of Missouri to locations within
or outside of Missouri, but no such outside ambulance shall
be used to pick up patients within Missouri for
transportation to locations within Missouri, except as
provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
4. The issuance of a license pursuant to the
provisions of sections 190.001 to 190.245 shall not be
construed so as to authorize any person to provide ambulance
services or to operate any ambulances without a franchise in
any city not within a county or in a political subdivision
in any county with a population of over nine hundred
thousand inhabitants, or a franchise, contract or mutual-aid
agreement in any other political subdivision which has
enacted an ordinance making it unlawful to do so.
5. Sections 190.001 to 190.245 shall not preclude the
adoption of any law, ordinance or regulation not in conflict
with such sections by any city not within a county, or at
least as strict as such sections by any county, municipality

SB 1292 7
or political subdivision except that no such regulations or
ordinances shall be adopted by a political subdivision in a
county with a population of over nine hundred thousand
inhabitants except by the county's governing body.
6. In a county with a population of over nine hundred
thousand inhabitants, the governing body of the county shall
set the standards for all ambulance services which shall
comply with subsection 5 of this section. All such
ambulance services must be licensed by the department. The
governing body of such county shall not prohibit a licensed
ambulance service from operating in the county, as long as
the ambulance service meets county standards.
7. An ambulance service or vehicle when operated for
the purpose of transporting persons who are sick, injured,
or otherwise incapacitated shall not be treated as a common
or contract carrier under the jurisdiction of the Missouri
division of motor carrier and railroad safety.
8. Sections 190.001 to 190.245 shall not apply to, nor
be construed to include, any motor vehicle used by an
employer for the transportation of such employer's employees
whose illness or injury occurs on private property, and not
on a public highway or property, nor to any person operating
such a motor vehicle.
9. A political subdivision that is authorized to
operate a licensed ambulance service may establish, operate,
maintain and manage its ambulance service, and select and
contract with a licensed ambulance service. Any political
subdivision may contract with a licensed ambulance service.
10. Except as provided in subsections 5 and 6, nothing
in section 67.300, or subsection 2 of section 190.109, shall
be construed to authorize any municipality or county which
is located within an ambulance district or a fire protection

SB 1292 8
district that is authorized to provide ambulance service to
promulgate laws, ordinances or regulations related to the
provision of ambulance services. This provision shall not
apply to any municipality or county which operates an
ambulance service established prior to August 28, 1998.
100 11. Nothing in section 67.300 or subsection 2 of
101 section 190.109 shall be construed to authorize any
102 municipality or county which is located within an ambulance
103 district or a fire protection district that is authorized to
104 provide ambulance service to operate an ambulance service
105 without a franchise in an ambulance district or a fire
106 protection district that is authorized to provide ambulance
107 service which has enacted an ordinance making it unlawful to
108 do so. This provision shall not apply to any municipality
109 or county which operates an ambulance service established
110 prior to August 28, 1998.
111 12. No provider of ambulance service within the state
112 of Missouri which is licensed by the department to provide
113 such service shall discriminate regarding treatment or
114 transportation of emergency patients on the basis of race,
115 sex, age, color, religion, sexual preference, national
116 origin, ancestry, handicap, medical condition or ability to
117 pay.
118 13. No provision of this section, other than
119 subsections 5, 6, 10 and 11 of this section, is intended to
120 limit or supersede the powers given to ambulance districts
121 pursuant to this chapter or to fire protection districts
122 pursuant to chapter 321, or to counties, cities, towns and
123 villages pursuant to chapter 67.
124 14. Upon the sale or transfer of any ground ambulance
125 service ownership, the owner of such service shall notify
126 the department of the change in ownership within thirty days

SB 1292 9
127 of such sale or transfer. After receipt of such notice, the
128 department shall conduct an inspection of the ambulance
129 service to verify compliance with the licensure standards of
130 sections 190.001 to 190.245.
131 15. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
132 contrary, no provider of ambulance service within the state
133 of Missouri that is licensed by the department to provide
134 such service shall transport a patient to an abortion
135 facility, as such term is defined in section 188.015.
✓